Utah statutes.
31A-8-207.   Termination of organization permit -- Payment of organization expenses.

Section 31A-5-209, other than Subsection 31A-5-209(3)(c), applies to the termination of the organization permit and the payment of organization expenses of organizations, except that "Section 31A-5-212" shall be read "Section 31A-8-213."

